test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verb-contracted_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable verbs belonging to FERTE_IV, GILLE_IV, DOHPPE_TV 

Tests:
  Verb - bállet: # FERTE_IV
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bállejetne
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [bálleje, bállejedne]
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bálleje, bállejedje]
    bállet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bálleleimme, bállešeimme]
    bállet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bálleše, bállešedje, bállele, bálleledje]
    bállet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bálleš, bálleža]

  Verb - bigget: # BORGE_IV
    bigget+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bigge
    bigget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biggii
    bigget+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [biggešii, biggelii]
    bigget+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [biggeš, biggeža]
    bigget+V+TV+Ger: [biggedin, biggediin, biggedettiin]
    bigget+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biggestalai

  Verb - biggot: # BASSO_IV
    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: biggojetne
    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [biggoje, biggojedne]
    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [biggoje, biggojedje]
    biggot+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [biggoleimme, biggošeimme]
    biggot+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [biggoše, biggošedje, biggole, biggoledje]
    biggot+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [biggoš, biggoža]
    biggot+V+IV+Ger: [biggodin, biggodiin, biggodettiin]
    biggot+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: biggostalaiga
    biggot+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth+Du3: biggostalaiga
    biggot+V+IV+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [biggodit, biggodat]


  Verb - rostet: # GILLE_IV
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: rostejetne
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [rosteje, rostejedne]
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [rosteje, rostejedje]
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [rosteleimme, rostešeimme]
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [rosteše, rostešedje, rostele, rosteledje]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [rosteš, rosteža]
    rostet+V+IV+Ger: [rostedin, rostediin, rostedettiin]
    rostet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostestalaiga
    rostet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth+Du3: rostestalaiga
    rostet+V+IV+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [rostedit, rostedat]


  Verb - bikšát: # CIRRO_IV
    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bikšájetne
    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [bikšáje, bikšájedne]
    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bikšáje, bikšájedje]
    bikšát+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bikšáleimme, bikšášeimme]
    bikšát+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bikšáše, bikšášedje, bikšále, bikšáledje]
    bikšát+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bikšáš, bikšáža]
    bikšát+V+IV+Ger: [bikšádin, bikšádiin, bikšádettiin]
    bikšát+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: bikšástalaiga
    bikšát+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth+Du3: bikšástalaiga
    bikšát+V+IV+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [bikšádit, bikšádat]


  Verb - hoitát: # DOHPPE_TV
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: hoitájetne
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [hoitáje, hoitájedne]
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hoitáje, hoitájedje]
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [hoitáleimme, hoitášeimme]
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [hoitále, hoitáše, hoitášedje, hoitáledje]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [hoitáš, hoitáža]
    hoitát+V+TV+Ger: [hoitádin, hoitádiin, hoitádettiin]
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitástalaiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth+Du3: hoitástalaiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/halla+V+Sup: [hoitáhalažit, hoitáhattažit]


  Verb - vuordát: # MUITA_TV
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuordájetne
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1+Err/Orth: [vuordáje, vuordájedne]
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vuordáje, vuordájedje]
    vuordát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [vuordáleimme, vuordášeimme]
    vuordát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [vuordále, vuordáše, vuordášedje, vuordáledje]
    vuordát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [vuordáš, vuordáža]
    vuordát+V+TV+Ger: [vuordádin, vuordádiin, vuordádettiin]
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuordástalaiga
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth+Du3: vuordástalaiga
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/halla+V+Sup: [vuordáhalažit, vuordáhattažit]
